Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.030

Member qualifications.

Each of the producer members of the commission shall:

(1) Be a citizen and resident of this state and the district or area which he or she represents; and

(2) Be and for the five years last preceding his or her election have been actually engaged as an owner or shareholder in producing dairy products within this state. These qualifications must continue during each member's term of office.

The dealer member shall be actively engaged as a dealer in dairy products or employed in a dealer capacity as an officer or employee at management level in a dairy products organization.

[ 2012 c 107 s 6; 2008 c 12 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 136 s 2; 1965 ex.s. c 44 s 4; 1961 c 11 s 15.44.030. Prior: 1959 c 163 s 4; prior: 1939 c 219 s 3, part; RRS s 6266-3, part.]